Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6361.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-37.4. Electric and gas meter reading required quarterly.
(a) Every electric and natural gas distribution public utility shall read, record and update
utility billing on quarterly scheduled intervals. Bills shall be forwarded promptly.
(b) A utility company which estimates bills shall file with the PUC a current, simple, clear
and concise statement of their formula used in preparing estimated bills.
(1) Estimated bills for ratepayers shall consist of charges for utility services calculated in
accordance with the formula approved by the PUC.
(2) Estimated bills may be submitted to ratepayers for months when the quarterly reading
is not scheduled or conducted.
(c) In the event the utility fails to read the meter on a quarterly basis, they shall not demand,
collect or require payment of any balance in excess of the amount required by the prior estimated
monthly bills. Any amount otherwise due for use in excess of the estimated monthly bill shall be
forfeited for any period in which the electric or natural gas distribution utility failed to read the
ratepayer's meter.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002951
========
LC002951 - Page 2 of 3